Utah statutes.
58-54-4.3.   Exemption from licensure.
A person may engage in the practice of radiology technology without being
licensed under this chapter if:
(1) (a)  the person is filling a new or existing position as an employee
performing the duties of a radiology practical technician when a licensed
radiology practical technician is not available to begin in the new position
or continue filling the existing position;
(b)  the total period in which the position is filled by the unlicensed person
is not more than 90 days;
(c)  the unlicensed person at all times performs services as a radiology
practical technician under the direct on-premises supervision of a radiology
practitioner; and
(d)  the employee position filled by an unlicensed person under this section
is an existing position and was filled by a person licensed under this chapter
immediately prior to employment of the unlicensed person;
(2)  the person:
(a)  performs services in a dental facility under the supervision of a dentist
licensed to practice in this state; and
(b)  has completed a radiology course approved by the Dentists and Dental
Hygienists Board created under Section 58-69-201; or
(3)  the person:
(a)  performs services in a medical facility under the supervision of a
podiatric physician licensed to practice in this state; and
(b)  has completed a radiology course approved by the Podiatric Physician
Board created under Section 58-5a-201.
